Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.400

Applicability of RCW 10.01.040 to chapter.

The provisions of RCW 10.01.040 apply to chapter 13.40 RCW.

[ 1979 c 155 s 74.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 c 155: See notes following RCW 13.04.011.